Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5580.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2130a. (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2), it is an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance for an insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a residential property liability insurance policy to do any of the following: (a) Consider the breed or mixture of breeds of any dog that resides at the insured property or the property that is to be insured as follows: (i) In determining cancellation of coverage under the policy. (ii) In determining refusal to provide coverage under the policy. (iii) In determining whether to increase the premium or rate for coverage under the policy. (iv) In determining the refusal to issue or renew the policy. (v) In determining the imposition of exclusions or limitations within the policy. (b) Asking or inquiring about or investigating the specific breed or mixture of breeds of a dog that resides at the insured property or the property that is to be insured. (2) This section does not prohibit an insurer from refusing to issue or renew or canceling a residential property liability insurance policy or imposing a reasonable increase in the rate or premium in a residential property liability insurance policy on the basis of sound underwriting and actuarial principles unrelated to the breed or mixture of breeds of a dog that resides at the insured property or the property that is to be insured. (3) As used in this section, "residential property liability insurance" means property and liability insurance provided for property used primarily for residential purposes, including, but not limited to, the following types of property: (a) A house. (b) A condominium unit. (c) A cooperative unit. (d) A room. (e) An apartment. (f) A commercial multiple-unit dwelling. (4) This section applies to residential property liability insurance policies issued or renewed on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2027.